Mississippi, session 2026, HB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Department of Corrections shall convert the Madison County Restitution Center, Flowood Restitution Center, and Pascagoula Restitution Center to post-release reentry centers. (2)  Any person who is eligible for release, including parole and early release supervision, shall be eligible for placement in a post-release reentry center.  Participation in a post-release reentry center is intended for those who do not have immediate access to housing or other support services upon release from incarceration. Residents of post-release reentry centers shall remain at a center for ninety (90) days or until other housing becomes available, whichever period is shorter.  A person otherwise eligible for release from incarceration may not be detained due to their refusal to accept placement in a post-release reentry center.  The residence restrictions provided in Section 45-33-25 shall not apply to post-release reentry centers regardless of the location of any center. SECTION 2. (1)  The Department of Corrections shall institute and administer services in post-release reentry centers at the facilities identified under Section 1 of this act and at other facilities which provide post-release reentry services. (2)  The Department of Corrections shall: (a)  Seek funding from federal or other sources to provide the maximum supportive services for residents and the families of residents who are participating in a post-release reentry program; (b)  Develop programs at post-release reentry centers through which residents are provided support, training, and connection to services necessary to contribute to society and the support of themselves and their families upon returning to local communities following incarceration; and (c)  Develop evidence-based pilot programs in furtherance of aiding personal growth and development, overcoming problematic behaviors, establishing a verified residency plan, and teaching skills to enhance the resident's quality of life and successful reentry into the community.  The programs may be residential or nonresidential as appropriate. (3)  The Department of Corrections shall assist residents in obtaining: (a)  Counseling/case management services; (b)  Housing; (c)  Employment or job skills training; (d)  State-issued driver's licenses or a state issued IDs should a driver's license be unobtainable; (e)  Health care services; (f)  Educational services; (g)  Cognitive behavioral programs; (h)  Drug and alcohol treatment and recovery services;  and (i)  Other community support services. SECTION 3.  Section 45-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-25.  (1)  (a)  Any person having a permanent or temporary residence in this state or who is employed or attending school in this state who has been convicted of a registrable offense in this state or another jurisdiction or who has been acquitted by reason of insanity of a registrable offense in this state or another jurisdiction shall register with the responsible agency and the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.  Registration shall not be required for an offense that is not a registrable sex offense or for an offender who is under fourteen (14) years of age.  The department shall provide the initial registration information as well as every change of name, change of address, change of status at a school, or other change of information as required by the department to the sheriff of the county of the residence address of the registrant, the sheriff of the county of the employment address, and the sheriff of the county of the school address, if applicable, and any other jurisdiction of the registrant through either written notice, electronic or telephone transmissions, or online access to registration information.  Further, the department shall provide this information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.  Additionally, upon notification by the registrant that he intends to reside outside the State of Mississippi, the department shall notify the appropriate state law enforcement agency of any state to which a registrant is moving or has moved. (b)  Any person having a permanent or temporary residence or who is employed or attending school in this state who has been adjudicated delinquent for a registrable sex offense listed in this paragraph that involved use of force against the victim shall register as a sex offender with the responsible agency and shall personally appear at a facility designated by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of registering with the responsible agency: (i)  Section 97-3-71 relating to rape and assault with intent to ravish; (ii)  Section 97-3-95 relating to sexual battery; (iii)  Section 97-3-65 relating to statutory rape; or (iv)  Conspiracy to commit, accessory to the commission of, or attempt to commit any offense listed in this paragraph. (2)  Any person required to register under this chapter shall submit the following information at the time of registration: (a)  Name, including a former name which has been legally changed; (b)  Street address of all current permanent and temporary residences within state or out of state at which the sex offender resides or habitually lives, including dates of temporary lodgings.  There is a presumption that a registrant owes a duty of updating registration information if the registrant remains away from a registered address for seven (7) or more aggregate days in a six (6) month period; (c)  Date, place and address of employment, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern or as a transient or day laborer; (d)  Crime for which charged, arrested or convicted; (e)  Date and place of conviction, adjudication or acquittal by reason of insanity; (f)  Aliases used or nicknames, ethnic or tribal names by which commonly known; (g)  Social security number and any purported social security number or numbers; (h)  Date and place of birth and any purported date and place of birth; (i)  Age, race, sex, height, weight, hair and eye colors, and any other physical description or identifying factors; (j)  A brief description of the offense or offenses for which the registration is required; (k)  Driver's license or state or other jurisdiction identification card number, which license or card may be electronically accessed by the Department of Public Safety; (l)  Anticipated future residence; (m)  If the registrant's residence is a motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home or manufactured home, the registrant shall also provide vehicle identification number, license tag number, registration number and a description, including color scheme, of the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home or manufactured home; if the registrant's place of residence is a vessel or houseboat, the registrant shall also provide the hull identification number, manufacturer's serial number, name of the vessel or houseboat, registration number and a description, including color scheme, of the vessel or houseboat, including permanent or frequent locations where the motor vehicle, trailer, mobile home, manufactured home, vessel or houseboat is kept; (n)  Vehicle make, model, color and license tag number for all vehicles owned or operated by the sex offender, whether for work or personal use, and the permanent or frequent locations where a vehicle is kept; (o)  Offense history; (p)  Photograph; (q)  Fingerprints and palm prints; (r)  Documentation of any treatment received for any mental abnormality or personality disorder of the person; (s)  Biological sample; (t)  Name of any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution or institution of higher education at which the offender is employed, carries on a vocation (with or without compensation) or is enrolled as a student, or will be enrolled as a student, and the registrant's status; (u)  Copy of conviction or sentencing order for the sex offense for which registration is required; (v)  The offender's parole, probation or supervised release status and the existence of any outstanding arrest warrants; (w)  Every online identity, screen name or username used, registered or created by a registrant; (x)  Professional licensing information which authorizes the registrant to engage in an occupation or carry out a trade or occupation; (y)  Information from passport and immigration documents; (z)  All telephone numbers, including, but not limited to, permanent residence, temporary residence, cell phone and employment phone numbers, whether landlines or cell phones; and (aa)  Any other information deemed necessary. (3)  For purposes of this chapter, a person is considered to be residing in this state if he maintains a permanent or temporary residence as defined in Section 45-33-23, including students, temporary employees and military personnel on assignment. (4)  (a)  A person required to register under this chapter shall not reside within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school, a child care facility, a residential child-caring agency, a children's group care home or any playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. (b)  A person residing within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or a child care facility does not commit a violation of this subsection if any of the following apply: (i)  The person is serving a sentence at a jail, prison, juvenile facility or other correctional institution or facility. (ii)  The person is subject to an order of commitment under Title 41, Mississippi Code of 1972. (iii)  The person established the subject residence before July 1, 2006. (iv)  The school or child care facility is established within three thousand (3,000) feet of the person's residence subsequent to the date the person established residency. (v)  The person established the subject residence between July 1, 2006, and January 1, 2014, in a location at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet from the school or child care facility. (vi)  The person is a minor or a ward under a guardianship. (c)  A person residing within three thousand (3,000) feet of the real property comprising a residential child-caring agency, a children's group care home or any playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years does not commit a violation of this subsection if any of the following apply: (i)  The person established the subject residence before July 1, 2008. (ii)  The residential child-caring agency, children's group care home, playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years is established within three thousand (3,000) feet of the person's residence subsequent to the date the person established residency. (iii)  The person established the subject residence between July 1, 2008, and January 1, 2014, in a location at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet from the residential child-caring agency, children's group care home, playground, ballpark or other recreational facility utilized by persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. (iv)  Any of the conditions described in subsection (4)(b)(i), (ii) or (vi) exist. (5)  The Department of Public Safety is required to obtain the text of the law defining the offense or offenses for which the registration is required. (6)  The residence restriction provided under this section shall not apply to post-release reentry centers regardless of the location of any center. SECTION 4.  Section 45-33-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-33-35.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall maintain a central registry of sex offender information as defined in Section 45-33-25 and shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.  The responsible agencies shall provide the information required in Section 45-33-25 on a form developed by the department to ensure accurate information is maintained. (2)  Upon conviction, adjudication or acquittal by reason of insanity of any sex offender, if the sex offender is not immediately confined or not sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the clerk of the court which convicted and sentenced the sex offender shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the department. (3)  Before release from prison or placement on parole, supervised release or in a work center * * *or restitution center, the Department of Corrections shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety. (4)  Before release from a community regional mental health center or from confinement in a mental institution following an acquittal by reason of insanity, the director of the facility shall inform the offender of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety. (5)  Before release from a youthful offender facility, the director of the facility shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety. (6)  In addition to performing the registration duties, the responsible agency shall: (a)  Inform the person having a duty to register that: (i)  The person is required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, at least ten (10) days before changing address. (ii)  Any change of address to another jurisdiction shall be reported to the department by personally appearing at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, not less than ten (10) days before the change of address. The offender shall comply with any registration requirement in the new jurisdiction. (iii)  The person must register in any jurisdiction where the person is employed, carries on a vocation, is stationed in the military or is a student. (iv)  Address verifications shall be made by personally appearing at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within the required time period. (v)  Notification or verification of a change in status of a registrant's enrollment, employment or vocation at any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher education shall be reported to the department by personally appearing at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of the change. (vi)  If the person has been convicted of a sex offense, the person shall notify any organization for which the person volunteers in which volunteers have direct, private or unsupervised contact with minors that the person has been convicted of a sex offense as provided in Section 45-33-32(1). (vii)  Upon any change of name or employment, a registrant is required to personally appear at a facility designated by the Department of Public Safety, or in a manner of the Department of Public Safety's choosing, including by electronic means, within three (3) business days of the change. (viii)  Upon any change of vehicle information, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (ix)  Upon any change of e-mail address or addresses, instant message address or addresses or any other designation used in Internet communications, postings or telephone communications, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (x)  Upon any change of information deemed to be necessary to the state's policy to assist local law enforcement agencies' efforts to protect their communities, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change. (b)  Require the person to read and sign a form stating that the duty of the person to register under this chapter has been explained. (c)  Obtain or facilitate the obtaining of a biological sample from every registrant as required by this chapter if such biological sample has not already been provided to the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory. (d)  Provide a copy of the order of conviction or sentencing order to the department at the time of registration. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.